Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3410
Physician, defined.

Physician means an individual licensed under
the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act to practice medicine and surgery or
osteopathic medicine and surgery.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 10.

Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-2001.